apertium-mwl.mwl.lexd
anteriorizar:anterioriz[AR]
antebir:anteb[IR]
antipatizar:antipatiz[AR]
anular:anul[AR]
anunciar:anunci[AR]
apadrinhar:apadrinh[AR]
apagar:apag[AR]
apaixonar:apaixon[AR]
apalpar:apalp[AR]
apanhar:apanh[AR]
aparafusar:aparafus[AR]
aparecer:aparec[ER]
apartar:apart[AR]
apaziguar:apazigu[AR]
apedrejar:apedrej[AR]
apelar:apel[AR]
aperceber:aperceb[ER]
aperfeiçoar:aperfeiço[AR]
apertar:apert[AR]
apetecer:apetec[ER]
<!LaCaixabblex>:LaCaixabblex>
apinhar:apinh[AR]
aplainar:aplain[AR]
aplanar:aplan[AR]
aplaudir:aplaud[IR]
aplicar:aplic[AR]
apocopar:apocop[AR]
apoderar:apoder[AR]
apoiar:apoi[AR]
apologizar:apologiz[AR]
apontar:apont[AR]
aposentar:aposent[AR]
apostar:apost[AR]
apostatar:apostat[AR]
apostolizar:apostoliz[AR]
apreciar:apreci[AR]
apreender:apreend[ER]
aprender:aprend[ER]
apresentar:apresent[AR]
apressar:apress[AR]
aprestar:aprest[AR]
aprisionar:aprision[AR]
aprofundar:aprofund[AR]
aprontar:apront[AR]
apropriar:apropri[AR]
aprobar:aprob[AR]
aprobeitar:aprobeit[AR]
aproximar:aproxim[AR]
apurar:apur[AR]
apósprocessar:apósprocess[AR]
aquecer:aquec[ER]
arar:ar[AR]
arabizar:arabiz[AR]
arbitrar:arbitr[AR]
arborizar:arboriz[AR]
arcaizar:arcaiz[AR]
arder:ard[ER]
arestizar:arestiz[AR]
arfar:arf[AR]
argumentar:argument[AR]
arianizar:arianiz[AR]
aristocratizar:aristocratiz[AR]
armar:arm[AR]
armazenar:armazen[AR]
aromatizar:aromatiz[AR]
arquibar:arquib[AR]
arraigar:arraig[AR]
arrancar:arranc[AR]
arranhar:arranh[AR]
arranjar:arranj[AR]
arrasar:arras[AR]
arrastar:arrast[AR]
arrebatar:arrebat[AR]
arrecadar:arrecad[AR]
arrefecer:arrefec[ER]
arrematar:arremat[AR]
arremeter:arremet[ER]
arrendar:arrend[AR]
arrendondar:arrendond[AR]
arrepender:arrepend[ER]
arrepiar:arrepi[AR]
arriscar:arrisc[AR]
arrojar:arroj[AR]
arruinar:arruin[AR]
arruinar:arruin[AR]
arterializar:arterializ[AR]
articular:articul[AR]
artificializar:artificializ[AR]
ascender:ascend[ER]
ascetizar:ascetiz[AR]
asfaltar:asfalt[AR]
asfixiar:asfixi[AR]
aspergir:asperg[IR]
aspirar:aspir[AR]
assentir:assent[IR]
assaltar:assalt[AR]
assassinar:assassin[AR]
assegurar:assegur[AR]
assemelhar:assemelh[AR]
assentar:assent[AR]
assessorar:assessor[AR]
assimilar:assimil[AR]
assinar:assin[AR]
assinalar:assinal[AR]
assistir:assist[IR]
assobiar:assobi[AR]
associar:associ[AR]
assolar:assol[AR]
assomar:assom[AR]
assombrar:assombr[AR]
assumir:assum[IR]
assustar:assust[AR]
atar:at[AR]
ater:at[ER]
atacar:atac[AR]
atalhar:atalh[AR]
atemorizar:atemoriz[AR]
atender:atend[ER]
atentar:atent[AR]
atenuar:atenu[AR]
aterrar:aterr[AR]
aterrissar:aterriss[AR]
aterrizar:aterriz[AR]
aterrorizar:aterroriz[AR]
atiçar:atiç[AR]
atingir:ating[IR]
atirar:atir[AR]
atibar:atib[AR]
atomizar:atomiz[AR]
atonizar:atoniz[AR]
atormentar:atorment[AR]
atrair:atra[IR]
atraiçoar:atraiço[AR]
atraiçoar:atraiço[AR]
atrapar:atrap[AR]
atrapalhar:atrapalh[AR]
atrapalhar:atrapalh[AR]
atrasar:atras[AR]
atrabessar:atrabess[AR]
atreber:atreb[ER]
atribuir:atribu[IR]
atuar:atu[AR]
atualizar:atualiz[AR]
atualizar:atualiz[AR]
auditar:audit[AR]
aumentar:aument[AR]
ausentar:ausent[AR]
austerizar:austeriz[AR]
autenticar:autentic[AR]
autoabaliar:autoabali[AR]
autodibidir:autodibid[IR]
automarginalizar:automarginaliz[AR]
automatizar:automatiz[AR]
automatizar:automatiz[AR]
autonomizar:autonomiz[AR]
autorizar:autoriz[AR]
auxiliar:auxili[AR]
abaliar:abali[AR]
abalizar:abaliz[AR]
abançar:abanç[AR]
abariar:abari[AR]
abenturar:abentur[AR]
abisar:abis[AR]
abibar:abib[AR]
azedar:azed[AR]
azeitar:azeit[AR]
açoitar:açoit[AR]
bacanalizar:bacanaliz[AR]
bacilizar:baciliz[AR]
baixar:baix[AR]
balir:bal[IR]
balançar:balanç[AR]
balear:bale[AR]
balizar:baliz[AR]
balsamizar:balsamiz[AR]
banir:ban[IR]
banalizar:banaliz[AR]
banhar:banh[AR]
batizar:batiz[AR]
baralhar:baralh[AR]
barbarizar:barbariz[AR]
barbear:barbe[AR]
baronizar:baroniz[AR]
basear:base[AR]
bastar:bast[AR]
bater:bat[ER]
batizar:batiz[AR]
beber:beb[ER]
bemolizar:bemoliz[AR]
beneficiar:benefici[AR]
benfeitorizar:benfeitoriz[AR]
beriberizar:beriberiz[AR]
bestializar:bestializ[AR]
bigamizar:bigamiz[AR]
binoculizar:binoculiz[AR]
blasfemar:blasfem[AR]
blindar:blind[AR]
bloquear:bloque[AR]
boicotar:boicot[AR]
bolchebizar:bolchebiz[AR]
bombardear:bombarde[AR]
bombear:bombe[AR]
bonificar:bonific[AR]
bordar:bord[AR]
brigar:brig[AR]
brilhar:brilh[AR]
brincar:brinc[AR]
brindar:brind[AR]
brotar:brot[AR]
brutalizar:brutaliz[AR]
burlar:burl[AR]
burocratizar:burocratiz[AR]
buscar:busc[AR]
caber:cab[ER]
cobrir:cobr[IR]
cair:ca[IR]
caçar:caç[AR]
cadastrar:cadastr[AR]
cagar:cag[AR]
caiar:cai[AR]
calar:cal[AR]
calcar:calc[AR]
calçar:calç[AR]
calcinar:calcin[AR]
calcular:calcul[AR]
calendarizar:calendariz[AR]
calibrar:calibr[AR]
caluniar:caluni[AR]
caminhar:caminh[AR]
canalizar:canaliz[AR]
cancelar:cancel[AR]
cancerizar:canceriz[AR]
candidatar:candidat[AR]
canonizar:canoniz[AR]
cansar:cans[AR]
cantar:cant[AR]
caotizar:caotiz[AR]
capar:cap[AR]
capacitar:capacit[AR]
capitalizar:capitaliz[AR]
capitanear:capitane[AR]
catar:cat[AR]
caturar:catur[AR]
caraterizar:carateriz[AR]
caramelizar:carameliz[AR]
caraterizar:carateriz[AR]
carbonizar:carboniz[AR]
carecer:carec[ER]
caricaturizar:caricaturiz[AR]
carnalizar:carnaliz[AR]
carregar:carreg[AR]
cartelizar:carteliz[AR]
casar:cas[AR]
castelhanizar:castelhaniz[AR]
castigar:castig[AR]
castrar:castr[AR]
catalogar:catalog[AR]
catedratizar:catedratiz[AR]
categorizar:categoriz[AR]
catequizar:catequiz[AR]
catolicizar:catoliciz[AR]
catolizar:catoliz[AR]
caulinizar:cauliniz[AR]
causar:caus[AR]
cauterizar:cauteriz[AR]
cabar:cab[AR]
cabalgar:cabalg[AR]
caçoar:caço[AR]
cear:ce[AR]
ceder:ced[ER]
celebrar:celebr[AR]
celebrizar:celebriz[AR]
centrar:centr[AR]
centralizar:centraliz[AR]
cercar:cerc[AR]
cerebralizar:cerebraliz[AR]
certificar:certific[AR]
cessar:cess[AR]
chamar:cham[AR]
chamarde:chamarde
champanhizar:champanhiz[AR]
chanfrar:chanfr[AR]
chapinar:chapin[AR]
chefiar:chefi[AR]
chegar:cheg[AR]
cheirar:cheir[AR]
chilrear:chilre[AR]
chocar:choc[AR]
chorar:chor[AR]
chober:chob[ER]
chumbar:chumb[AR]
chutar:chut[AR]
cicatrizar:cicatriz[AR]
cingir:cing[IR]
cindir:cind[IR]
circular:circul[AR]
circundar:circund[AR]
citar:cit[AR]
cibilizar:cibiliz[AR]
clamar:clam[AR]
clarear:clare[AR]
classificar:classific[AR]
clausurar:clausur[AR]
cleopatrizar:cleopatriz[AR]
clericalizar:clericaliz[AR]
clicar:clic[AR]
clicar:clic[AR]
climatizar:climatiz[AR]
clisterizar:clisteriz[AR]
clonar:clon[AR]
cloroformizar:cloroformiz[AR]
coadjubar:coadjub[AR]
coalizar:coaliz[AR]
cobaltizar:cobaltiz[AR]
cobiçar:cobiç[AR]
cobrar:cobr[AR]
cocainizar:cocainiz[AR]
cochichar:cochich[AR]
coexistir:coexist[IR]
cogitar:cogit[AR]
coincidir:coincid[IR]
colar:col[AR]
colaborar:colabor[AR]
colapsar:colaps[AR]
coleccionar:coleccion[AR]
colecionar:colecion[AR]
coletar:colet[AR]
coletar:colet[AR]
colmar:colm[AR]
colocar:coloc[AR]
colonizar:coloniz[AR]
colorir:color[IR]
colorizar:coloriz[AR]
coltarizar:coltariz[AR]
cumer:cum[ER]
cumandar:cumand[AR]
cumbater:cumbat[ER]
cumbinar:cumbin[AR]
cumbinarcum:cumbinarcum
cumeçar:cumeç[AR]
cumemorar:cumemor[AR]
cumentar:cument[AR]
cumercializar:cumercializ[AR]
cumeter:cumet[ER]
cumober:cumob[ER]
cumpetir:cumpet[IR]

cumpatar:cumpat[AR]
cumparar:cumpar[AR]
cumparecer:cumparec[ER]
cumpartilhar:cumpartilh[AR]
cumpatibilizar:cumpatibiliz[AR]
cumpensar:cumpens[AR]
cumpilar:cumpil[AR]
cumplementar:cumplement[AR]
cumpletar:cumplet[AR]
cumplicar:cumplic[AR]
cumportar:cumport[AR]
cumprar:cumpr[AR]
cumprazer:cumpraz[ER]
cumpreender:cumpreend[ER]
cumprimir:cumprim[IR]
cumprimir:cumprim[IR]
cumprometer:cumpromet[ER]
cumprobar:cumprob[AR]
quemunicar:quemunic[AR]
quemunizar:quemuniz[AR]
quemutar:quemut[AR]
cunceber:cunceb[ER]
cunceder:cunced[ER]
cuncentrar:cuncentr[AR]
cunciliar:cuncili[AR]
cuncluir:cunclu[IR]
cuncordar:cuncord[AR]
cuncorrer:cuncorr[ER]
cuncretizar:cuncretiz[AR]
cundizer:cundiz[ER]
cundecorar:cundecor[AR]
cundenar:cunden[AR]
cundicionar:cundicion[AR]
cunduzir:cunduz[IR]
cunduzir:cunduz[IR]
cunetar:cunet[AR]
cunferir:cunfer[IR]
cunfederar:cunfeder[AR]
cunfessar:cunfess[AR]
cunfiar:cunfi[AR]
cunfigurar:cunfigur[AR]
cunfirmar:cunfirm[AR]
cunfiscar:cunfisc[AR]
cunfluir:cunflu[IR]
cunformar:cunform[AR]
cunfraternizar:cunfraterniz[AR]
cunfrontar:cunfront[AR]
cunfundir:cunfund[IR]
cungelar:cungel[AR]
cunhecer:cunhec[ER]
cunjurar:cunjur[AR]
cunotar:cunot[AR]
cunquistar:cunquist[AR]
recunquistar:recunquist[AR]
reboltar:rebolt[AR]
cunseguir:cunsegu[IR]
cunsumir:cunsum[IR]
cunsagrar:cunsagr[AR]
cunsciencializar:cunsciencializ[AR]
cunsentir:cunsent[IR]
cunsertar:cunsert[AR]
cunserbar:cunserb[AR]
cunsiderar:cunsider[AR]
cunsignar:cunsign[AR]
cunsistir:cunsist[IR]
cunsolar:cunsol[AR]
cunsolidar:cunsolid[AR]
cunsonantizar:cunsonantiz[AR]
cunstar:cunst[AR]
cunstatar:cunstat[AR]
cunstituir:cunstitu[IR]
cunstitucionalizar:cunstitucionaliz[AR]
cunstruir:cunstru[IR]
cunsultar:cunsult[AR]
cunsumar:cunsum[AR]
cuntar:cunt[AR]
cunter:cunt[ER]
cuntabilizar:cuntabiliz[AR]
cuntatar:cuntat[AR]
cuntaminar:cuntamin[AR]
cuntatar:cuntat[AR]
cuntemplar:cuntempl[AR]
cuntemporizar:cuntemporiz[AR]
cuntender:cuntend[ER]
cuntentar:cuntent[AR]
cuntestar:cuntest[AR]
cuntextualizar:cuntextualiz[AR]
cuntinuar:cuntinu[AR]
cuntinuaraseguir:cuntinuarasegu[IR]
cuntrair:cuntra[IR]
cuntradizer:cuntradiz[ER]

cuntrariar:cuntrari[AR]
cuntrastar:cuntrast[AR]
cuntratar:cuntrat[AR]
cuntrabir:cuntrab[IR]
cuntribuir:cuntribu[IR]
cuntrolar:cuntrol[AR]
cunbir:cunb[IR]
cunbencer:cunbenc[ER]
cunbergir:cunberg[IR]
cunbersar:cunbers[AR]
cunberter:cunbert[ER]
cunbidar:cunbid[AR]
cunbiber:cunbib[ER]
cunbocar:cunboc[AR]
cooperar:cooper[AR]
cootar:coot[AR]
coordenar:coorden[AR]
copiar:copi[AR]
copiarpara:copiarpara
coproduzir:coproduz[IR]
coproduzir:coproduz[IR]
cordializar:cordializ[AR]
coreografar:coreograf[AR]
coroar:coro[AR]
corporalizar:corporaliz[AR]
corporizar:corporiz[AR]
correr:corr[ER]
correlacionar:correlacion[AR]
corresponder:correspond[ER]
corresponsabilizar:corresponsabiliz[AR]
corrigir:corrig[IR]
corromper:corromp[ER]
cortar:cort[AR]
cosmopolizar:cosmopoliz[AR]
costumar:costum[AR]
costurar:costur[AR]
cotar:cot[AR]
cotizar:cotiz[AR]
coxear:coxe[AR]
cozer:coz[ER]
cozinhar:cozinh[AR]
crer:cr[ER]
crerque:crerque
crerem:crerem


cremorizar:cremoriz[AR]
crepusculizar:crepusculiz[AR]
crescer:cresc[ER]
cretinizar:cretiniz[AR]
criar:cri[AR]
criminalizar:criminaliz[AR]
cristalizar:cristaliz[AR]
cristianizar:cristianiz[AR]
criticar:critic[AR]
cromatizar:cromatiz[AR]
croniquizar:croniquiz[AR]
crucificar:crucific[AR]
cruzar:cruz[AR]
cuidar:cuid[AR]
culminar:culmin[AR]
culpar:culp[AR]
culpabilizar:culpabiliz[AR]
cultibar:cultib[AR]
cultuar:cultu[AR]
cumprir:cumpr[IR]
cumprimentar:cumpriment[AR]
cunhar:cunh[AR]
cuntribuir:cuntribu[IR]
curar:cur[AR]
curarizar:curariz[AR]
curbar:curb[AR]
cuspir:cusp[IR]
custar:cust[AR]
custodiar:custodi[AR]
cutinizar:cutiniz[AR]
dar:d[AR]
darcunta:darcunta
darbanho:darbanho
darumduche:darumduche
darumbanhodechubeiro:darumbanhodechubeiro
darumaducha:darumaducha
dizer:diz[ER]
dormir:dorm[IR]
daralta:daralta
darbaixa:darbaixa
despir:desp[IR]
doer:do[ER]
darcerto:darcerto
darprioridade:darprioridade
darumlance:darumlance
darosparabéns:darosparabéns
darbergonha:darbergonha
darasco:darasco
darmedo:darmedo
darumbeijo:darumbeijo
darsono:darsono
dançar:danç[AR]
danificar:danific[AR]
datar:dat[AR]
debater:debat[ER]
debilitar:debilit[AR]
debochar:deboch[AR]
decair:deca[IR]
dececionar:dececion[AR]
decentralizar:decentraliz[AR]
decepcionar:decepcion[AR]
decidir:decid[IR]
decifrar:decifr[AR]
declarar:declar[AR]
declinar:declin[AR]
decolar:decol[AR]
decolar:decol[AR]
